Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3191.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 5012XG (9) 91 jda/jh S.F. _____ H.F. _____ DIVISION I 1 FY 2026-2027 APPROPRIATIONS ââ DEPARTMENT FOR THE BLIND 2 Section 1. GENERAL FUND APPROPRIATIONS ââ 3 ADMINISTRATION. There is appropriated from the general 4 fund of the state to the department for the blind for the 5 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, 6 the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 7 used for the purposes designated: 8 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 9 purposes: 10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,207,190 11 DIVISION II 12 FY 2026-2027 APPROPRIATIONS ââ DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION 13 Sec. 2. GENERAL FUND APPROPRIATIONS. There is appropriated 14 from the general fund of the state to the department of 15 education for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and 16 ending June 30, 2027, the following amounts, or so much thereof 17 as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 18 1. GENERAL ADMINISTRATION 19 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 20 purposes: 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 7,073,808 22 2. CAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION ADMINISTRATION 23 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 24 purposes: 25 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 721,779 26 3. PUBLIC BROADCASTING DIVISION 27 For salaries, support, maintenance, capital expenditures, 28 and miscellaneous purposes: 29 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 8,165,236 30 4. CAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION 31 For reimbursement for career and technical education 32 expenditures made by regional career and technical education 33 planning partnerships in accordance with section 256.136: 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,952,459 35 -1- LSB 5012XG (9) 91 jda/jh 1/ 21 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ 5. SCHOOL FOOD SERVICE 1 a. For use as state matching moneys for federal programs 2 that shall be disbursed according to federal regulations, 3 including salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 4 purposes: 5 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,253,055 6 b. From the moneys appropriated in this subsection, $76,258 7 shall be allocated to the administrative costs associated with 8 participation in the federal summer electronic benefit transfer 9 program. 10 6. BIRTH TO AGE THREE SERVICES 11 a. For expansion of the federal Individuals with 12 Disabilities Education Improvement Act of 2004, Pub. L. No. 13 108-446, as amended to January 1, 2018, birth through age three 14 services due to increased numbers of children qualifying for 15 those services: 16 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,721,400 17 b. From the moneys appropriated in this subsection, 18 $383,769 shall be allocated to the child health specialty 19 clinics administered by the state university of Iowa in order 20 to provide additional support for infants and toddlers who are 21 born prematurely, drug-exposed, or medically fragile. 22 7. EARLY HEAD START PROJECTS 23 a. For early head start projects: 24 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 574,500 25 b. The moneys appropriated in this subsection shall be 26 used for implementation and expansion of early head start 27 pilot projects addressing the comprehensive cognitive, social, 28 emotional, and developmental needs of children from birth to 29 age three, including prenatal support for qualified families. 30 The projects shall promote healthy prenatal outcomes and 31 healthy family functioning, and strengthen the development of 32 infants and toddlers in low-income families. Priority shall be 33 given to those organizations that have previously qualified for 34 and received state funding to administer an early head start 35 -2- LSB 5012XG (9) 91 jda/jh 2/ 21 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ project. 1 8. STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT AND TEACHER QUALITY PROGRAM 2 For purposes of the student achievement and teacher quality 3 program established pursuant to chapter 284 : 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,990,467 5 9. STATEWIDE STUDENT ASSESSMENT 6 a. For distribution to the Iowa testing program by the 7 department of education on behalf of school districts and 8 accredited nonpublic schools to offset the costs associated 9 with a statewide student assessment administered in accordance 10 with section 256.7, subsection 21 , paragraph âbâ: 11 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,000,000 12 b. From the moneys appropriated in this subsection, not more 13 than $300,000 shall be distributed to the Iowa testing programs 14 within the state university of Iowa college of education 15 to offset the costs of administering the statewide student 16 assessment at accredited nonpublic schools. 17 10. STATEWIDE CLEARINGHOUSE TO EXPAND WORK-BASED LEARNING 18 For support costs associated with the creation of a 19 statewide clearinghouse to expand work-based learning as a part 20 of the future ready Iowa initiative: 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 300,000 22 11. POSTSECONDARY SUMMER CLASSES FOR HIGH SCHOOL STUDENTS 23 PROGRAM 24 For support costs associated with the creation of a program 25 to provide additional moneys for resident high school pupils 26 enrolled in grades 9 through 12 to attend a community college 27 for college-level classes or attend a class taught by a 28 community college-employed instructor during the summer and 29 outside of the regular school year through a contractual 30 agreement between a community college and a school district 31 under the future ready Iowa initiative: 32 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 600,000 33 Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys received by the 34 department pursuant to this subsection that remain unencumbered 35 -3- LSB 5012XG (9) 91 jda/jh 3/ 21 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert 1 but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes 2 specified in this subsection until the close of the succeeding 3 fiscal year. 4 12. JOBS FOR AMERICAâS GRADUATES 5 For school districts to reinforce collaborative efforts and 6 regional initiatives that accelerate work-based learning and 7 credential attainment, and to provide direct career education 8 services to identified middle school or high school students 9 enrolled in school districts through direct instruction by a 10 jobs for Americaâs graduates specialist: 11 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 9,946,450 12 Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys received by the 13 department pursuant to this subsection that remain unencumbered 14 or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert 15 but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes 16 specified in this subsection until the close of the succeeding 17 fiscal year. 18 13. ATTENDANCE CENTER PERFORMANCE/GENERAL INTERNET SITE AND 19 DATA SYSTEM SUPPORT 20 For administration of a process for school districts to 21 establish specific performance goals and to evaluate the 22 performance of each attendance center operated by the district 23 in order to arrive at an overall school performance grade and 24 report card for each attendance center, for internet site and 25 data system support: 26 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 250,000 27 14. SUCCESSFUL PROGRESSION FOR EARLY READERS 28 For distribution to school districts for implementation 29 of section 279.68, subsection 2 , relating to successful 30 progression for early readers: 31 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 7,824,782 32 15. EARLY WARNING SYSTEM FOR LITERACY 33 a. For purposes of purchasing a statewide license for an 34 early warning assessment and administering the early warning 35 -4- LSB 5012XG (9) 91 jda/jh 4/ 21 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ system for literacy established in accordance with section 1 279.68 and rules adopted in accordance with section 256.7, 2 subsection 31 : 3 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,915,000 4 b. The department shall administer and distribute to school 5 districts and accredited nonpublic schools the early warning 6 assessment system that allows teachers to screen and monitor 7 student literacy skills from prekindergarten through grade 8 six. The department may charge school districts and accredited 9 nonpublic schools a fee for the system not to exceed the actual 10 costs to purchase a statewide license for the early warning 11 assessment minus the moneys received by the department under 12 this subsection. The fee shall be determined by dividing the 13 actual remaining costs to purchase the statewide license for 14 the school year by the number of pupils assessed under the 15 system in the current fiscal year. School districts may use 16 moneys received pursuant to section 257.10, subsection 11 , and 17 moneys received for purposes of implementing section 279.68, 18 subsection 2 , to pay the early warning assessment system fee. 19 16. IOWA READING RESEARCH CENTER 20 a. For purposes of the Iowa reading research center in 21 order to implement, in collaboration with the area education 22 agencies, the provisions of section 256.9, subsection 49 , 23 paragraph âcâ: 24 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,500,000 25 b. From moneys appropriated in this subsection, not more 26 than $250,000 shall be used for collaborations with the state 27 board of education relating to the approval of practitioner 28 preparation programs pursuant to section 256.7, subsection 3 , 29 paragraph âcâ, and with the board of educational examiners for 30 the establishment and continuing oversight of the advanced 31 dyslexia specialist endorsement pursuant to section 256.146, 32 subsection 21. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and 33 ending June 30, 2027, the center shall submit a report to the 34 general assembly detailing the expenditures of moneys used for 35 -5- LSB 5012XG (9) 91 jda/jh 5/ 21 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ purposes of this paragraph âbâ. 1 c. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys received by the 2 department pursuant to this subsection that remain unencumbered 3 or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert 4 but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes 5 specified in this subsection until the close of the succeeding 6 fiscal year. 7 17. COMPUTER SCIENCE PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT INCENTIVE 8 FUND 9 For deposit in the computer science professional development 10 incentive fund established in section 284.6A : 11 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 500,000 12 18. CHILDRENâS MENTAL HEALTH SCHOOL-BASED TRAINING AND 13 SUPPORT 14 a. For distribution to area education agencies for 15 school-based childrenâs mental health services, including 16 mental health awareness training for educators: 17 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,899,682 18 b. Of the moneys appropriated in this subsection for 19 distribution to area education agencies, $200,000 shall be 20 used for purposes of implementing a childrenâs grief and loss 21 rural pilot program to serve Iowa children in rural school 22 districts or accredited nonpublic schools. The program shall 23 be administered by, and the moneys allocated pursuant to this 24 paragraph shall be distributed to, an existing statewide 25 not-for-profit health care organization that currently provides 26 grief and loss services to children. For the fiscal year 27 beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the health 28 care organization receiving moneys pursuant to this paragraph 29 shall prepare a report, in collaboration with the department 30 of education, detailing the expenditures of moneys used for 31 the purposes of this program and its outcomes, which shall be 32 submitted to the general assembly by September 30, 2027. 33 19. BEST BUDDIES IOWA 34 a. For school districts to create opportunities for 35 -6- LSB 5012XG (9) 91 jda/jh 6/ 21 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ one-to-one friendships, integrated employment, and leadership 1 development for students with intellectual and developmental 2 disabilities: 3 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 35,000 4 b. The department of education shall establish criteria for 5 the distribution of moneys appropriated under this subsection 6 and shall require an organization receiving moneys under this 7 subsection to annually report student identifying data for 8 students participating in the program to the department in the 9 manner prescribed by the department as a condition of receiving 10 such moneys. 11 20. MIDWESTERN HIGHER EDUCATION COMPACT 12 For distribution to the midwestern higher education compact 13 to pay Iowaâs member state annual obligation: 14 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 118,450 15 Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated pursuant 16 to this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at 17 the close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 18 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 19 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 20 21. NONPUBLIC SCHOOL CONCURRENT ENROLLMENT PAYMENTS TO 21 COMMUNITY COLLEGES 22 For payments to community colleges for the concurrent 23 enrollment of accredited nonpublic school students under 24 section 261E.8, subsection 2 , paragraph âbâ: 25 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 26 Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys received by the 27 department pursuant to this subsection that remain unencumbered 28 or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert 29 but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes 30 designated until the close of the succeeding fiscal year. 31 22. COMMUNITY COLLEGES 32 For general state financial aid to merged areas, as defined 33 in section 260C.2 , in accordance with section 260C.18C: 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $247,008,533 35 -7- LSB 5012XG (9) 91 jda/jh 7/ 21 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ 23. IOWA SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF 1 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 2 purposes: 3 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 12,813,313 4 24. IOWA EDUCATIONAL SERVICES FOR THE BLIND AND VISUALLY 5 IMPAIRED PROGRAM 6 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 7 purposes: 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5,112,412 9 25. SCIENCE, TECHNOLOGY, ENGINEERING, AND MATHEMATICS 10 (STEM) COLLABORATIVE INITIATIVE 11 For purposes of the science, technology, engineering, and 12 mathematics (STEM) collaborative initiative established in 13 section 256.111: 14 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,310,409 15 a. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the 16 moneys appropriated in this subsection shall be expended for 17 salaries, staffing, institutional support, activities directly 18 related to recruitment of kindergarten through grade 12 19 mathematics and science teachers, and for ongoing mathematics 20 and science programming for students enrolled in kindergarten 21 through grade 12. 22 b. From the moneys appropriated in this subsection, not less 23 than $500,000 shall be used to provide, or support access to, 24 all of the following: 25 (1) Technology and emerging technology education 26 opportunities, including but not limited to artificial 27 intelligence, computer science, data science, and related 28 fields, to high school students and career academy students. 29 (2) Opportunities for students and instructional staff to 30 obtain industry-recognized credentials, certifications, or 31 other validated competencies. 32 (3) Research-based or evidence-informed instructional 33 content and learning frameworks. 34 (4) Online or hybrid access to instructional content. 35 -8- LSB 5012XG (9) 91 jda/jh 8/ 21 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ (5) Instructional software, platforms, tools, or resources 1 for classroom and student use. 2 (6) Validation, certification, or credentialing of skills 3 and competencies across a broad range of technology-related and 4 artificial intelligence-related disciplines. 5 (7) Professional development, training, or 6 capacity-building opportunities for teachers and instructional 7 staff. 8 (8) Deployment, implementation, and programmatic support, 9 including but not limited to alignment or integration with 10 applicable academic standards or workforce needs. 11 c. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys received by the 12 department pursuant to this subsection that remain unencumbered 13 or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert 14 but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes 15 designated until the close of the succeeding fiscal year. 16 26. THERAPEUTIC CLASSROOM INCENTIVE FUND 17 For deposit in the therapeutic classroom incentive fund 18 established in section 256.25 : 19 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,351,382 20 27. ONLINE STATE JOB POSTING SYSTEM 21 For purposes of administering an online state job posting 22 system that allows the department of education, school 23 districts, charter schools, area education agencies, and 24 accredited nonpublic schools to post job openings on an 25 internet site: 26 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 265,000 27 28. LEAD-K PROGRAM 28 For purposes of maintaining and implementing the program 29 established pursuant to section 256.106, including ensuring 30 statewide consistency in guidance and supports related to 31 language and communication outcomes for children who are deaf 32 or hard of hearing: 33 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 200,000 34 29. DIVISION OF SPECIAL EDUCATION 35 -9- LSB 5012XG (9) 91 jda/jh 9/ 21 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ For general supervision, oversight, compliance, employee 1 salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes 2 within the area education agency regions and the department of 3 education main office: 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 10,000,000 5 30. PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT 6 For purposes of providing required professional development 7 to public and nonpublic schools: 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,676,458 9 31. COLLEGE STUDENT AID COMMISSION 10 a. Administration 11 For general administration salaries, support, maintenance, 12 and miscellaneous purposes, and for the administration of the 13 future ready Iowa skilled workforce last-dollar scholarship 14 program in accordance with section 256.228, including salaries, 15 support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes related to the 16 future ready Iowa skilled workforce last-dollar scholarship 17 program: 18 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 591,533 19 b. National guard service scholarship program 20 For purposes of providing national guard service 21 scholarships under the program established in section 256.210: 22 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,600,000 23 c. All Iowa opportunity scholarship program 24 (1) For deposit in the all Iowa opportunity scholarship fund 25 created in section 256.212: 26 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,229,468 27 (2) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, if the 28 moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph exceed $500,000, 29 âeligible institutionâ as defined in section 256.212 shall, 30 during the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, include 31 accredited private institutions as defined in section 256.183. 32 d. Teach Iowa scholar program 33 For deposit in the teach Iowa scholar fund established in 34 section 256.218: 35 -10- LSB 5012XG (9) 91 jda/jh 10/ 21 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 948,715 1 e. Health care professional incentive program 2 For deposit in the health care professional incentive 3 program fund created in section 256.222: 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 7,985,911 5 f. Rural veterinarian loan repayment program 6 For deposit in the rural veterinary care trust fund created 7 in section 256.226: 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 700,000 9 g. Future ready Iowa skilled workforce last-dollar 10 scholarship program 11 For deposit in the future ready Iowa skilled workforce 12 last-dollar scholarship fund created in section 256.228: 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 23,927,005 14 h. Future ready Iowa skilled workforce grant program 15 For deposit in the future ready Iowa skilled workforce grant 16 fund created in section 256.229: 17 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 425,000 18 i. Iowa workforce grant and incentive program 19 For deposit in the Iowa workforce grant and incentive 20 program fund created in section 256.230: 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,500,000 22 j. Court reporter equipment grant program 23 For deposit in the court reporter equipment grant program 24 fund created in section 256.231: 25 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 50,000 26 Sec. 3. IOWA SKILLED WORKER AND JOB CREATION FUND 27 APPROPRIATIONS. There is appropriated from the Iowa skilled 28 worker and job creation fund created in section 8.57J to the 29 department of education for the fiscal year beginning July 30 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following amounts, or 31 so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 32 designated: 33 1. For purposes of providing skilled workforce shortage 34 tuition grants in accordance with section 256.227: 35 -11- LSB 5012XG (9) 91 jda/jh 11/ 21 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5,000,000 1 2. For deposit in the workforce training and economic 2 development funds created pursuant to section 260C.18A: 3 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 15,100,000 4 From the moneys appropriated in this subsection, not 5 more than $100,000 shall be used by the department for 6 administration of the workforce training and economic 7 development funds created pursuant to section 260C.18A . 8 3. a. For capital projects at community colleges that meet 9 the definition of the term âvertical infrastructureâ in section 10 8.57, subsection 3 , paragraph âcâ: 11 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,000,000 12 b. Moneys appropriated in this subsection shall be 13 disbursed pursuant to section 260G.6, subsection 3 . Projects 14 that qualify for moneys appropriated in this subsection must 15 include at least one of the following: 16 (1) Accelerated career education program capital projects. 17 (2) Major renovations and major repair needs, including 18 health, life, and fire safety needs, including compliance with 19 the federal Americans with Disabilities Act. 20 4. For deposit in the pathways for academic career and 21 employment fund created in section 260H.2 : 22 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 4,800,000 23 5. For deposit in the gap tuition assistance fund 24 established in section 260I.2 : 25 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,000,000 26 6. For support costs associated with administering a 27 workforce preparation outcome reporting system for the purpose 28 of collecting and reporting data relating to the educational 29 and employment outcomes of workforce preparation programs 30 receiving moneys pursuant to this section: 31 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 75,000 32 7. For STEM best: 33 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 700,000 34 Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in this 35 -12- LSB 5012XG (9) 91 jda/jh 12/ 21 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ section that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of 1 the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available for 2 expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of the 3 succeeding fiscal year. 4 Sec. 4. CHIROPRACTIC LOAN FUNDS. Notwithstanding section 5 256.204, the moneys deposited in the chiropractic loan 6 revolving fund created in section 256.204 for the fiscal year 7 beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, may be used 8 for purposes of the chiropractic loan forgiveness program 9 established in section 256.205. 10 Sec. 5. PRESCRIPTION DRUG COSTS. The department of 11 administrative services shall pay the Iowa school for the deaf 12 and the Iowa educational services for the blind and visually 13 impaired program the moneys collected from the counties during 14 the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, for expenses relating 15 to prescription drug costs for students attending the Iowa 16 school for the deaf and the Iowa educational services for the 17 blind and visually impaired program. 18 DIVISION III 19 FY 2026-2027 APPROPRIATIONS ââ STATE BOARD OF REGENTS 20 Sec. 6. GENERAL FUND APPROPRIATIONS. There is appropriated 21 from the general fund of the state to the state board of 22 regents for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending 23 June 30, 2027, the following amounts, or so much thereof as is 24 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 25 1. OFFICE OF STATE BOARD OF REGENTS 26 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 27 purposes: 28 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 764,642 29 For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30 30, 2027, the state board of regents shall submit a quarterly 31 financial report to the general assembly in a format agreed 32 upon by the state board of regents office and the legislative 33 services agency. The report submitted for the quarter ending 34 December 31, 2026, must include the five-year graduation rates 35 -13- LSB 5012XG (9) 91 jda/jh 13/ 21 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ for the regents universities. 1 b. For distribution to the western Iowa regents resource 2 center: 3 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 268,297 4 c. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending 5 June 30, 2027, the state board of regents and the institutions 6 of higher learning governed by the state board of regents 7 shall not reduce moneys budgeted for the fiscal year for the 8 institutionsâ police departments. 9 d. For allocation in equal parts by the state board of 10 regents to the state university of Iowa, the Iowa state 11 university of science and technology, and the university 12 of northern Iowa to support the John Pappajohn centers for 13 entrepreneurship: 14 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 125,000 15 The moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph shall be 16 used to supplement, not supplant, any other funding received by 17 the John Pappajohn centers for entrepreneurship. 18 2. STATE UNIVERSITY OF IOWA 19 a. General university 20 For salaries, support, maintenance, equipment, financial 21 aid, and miscellaneous purposes: 22 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $226,848,800 23 b. Oakdale campus 24 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 25 purposes: 26 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,103,819 27 c. State hygienic laboratory 28 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 29 purposes: 30 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 4,822,610 31 d. Family practice program 32 For allocation by the dean of the college of medicine, with 33 approval of the advisory board, to qualified participants 34 to carry out the provisions of chapter 148D for the family 35 -14- LSB 5012XG (9) 91 jda/jh 14/ 21 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ practice residency education program, including salaries and 1 support: 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,220,598 3 e. Child health care services 4 For specialized child health care services, including 5 childhood cancer diagnostic and treatment network programs, 6 rural comprehensive care for hemophilia patients, and the Iowa 7 high-risk infant follow-up program, including salaries and 8 support: 9 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 634,502 10 f. Statewide cancer registry 11 For the statewide cancer registry: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 143,410 13 g. Substance abuse consortium 14 For distribution to the Iowa consortium for substance abuse 15 research and evaluation: 16 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 53,427 17 h. Center for biocatalysis 18 For the center for biocatalysis: 19 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 696,342 20 i. Primary health care initiative 21 For the primary health care initiative in the college of 22 medicine: 23 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 624,374 24 From the moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph, 25 $254,889 shall be allocated to the department of family 26 practice at the state university of Iowa college of medicine 27 for family practice faculty and support staff. 28 j. Birth defects registry 29 For the birth defects registry: 30 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 36,839 31 k. Larned A. Waterman Iowa nonprofit resource center 32 For the Larned A. Waterman Iowa nonprofit resource center: 33 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 156,389 34 l. Iowa online advanced placement academy science, 35 -15- LSB 5012XG (9) 91 jda/jh 15/ 21 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ technology, engineering, and mathematics initiative 1 For the Iowa online advanced placement academy science, 2 technology, engineering, and mathematics initiative established 3 in section 263.8A : 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 463,616 5 m. Iowa flood center 6 For the Iowa flood center for use by the universityâs college 7 of engineering pursuant to section 466C.1 : 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,205,593 9 n. College of nursing 10 For employing additional instructors in the college of 11 nursing to increase the number of students who graduate from 12 the college of nursing: 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,800,000 14 o. Center for intellectual freedom 15 For purposes of supporting the center for intellectual 16 freedom established in section 263C.2: 17 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 18 3. IOWA STATE UNIVERSITY OF SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY 19 For salaries, support, maintenance, equipment, financial 20 aid, and miscellaneous purposes: 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $232,541,614 22 4. UNIVERSITY OF NORTHERN IOWA 23 a. General university 24 For salaries, support, maintenance, equipment, financial 25 aid, and miscellaneous purposes: 26 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $103,422,558 27 b. Real estate education program 28 For purposes of the real estate education program: 29 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 123,523 30 c. Educators for Iowa 31 For purposes of recruiting additional students to 32 participate in educational opportunities that lead to teacher 33 licensure: 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,500,000 35 -16- LSB 5012XG (9) 91 jda/jh 16/ 21 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ d. Center for civic education 1 For purposes of establishing and operating a center for 2 civic education that promotes the values of free speech, 3 civic leadership, public service, and citizenship, and 4 that enhances civic education among students enrolled in 5 colleges and universities in this state, students enrolled 6 in prekindergarten through grade twelve in schools in this 7 state, teachers, and the public by developing and implementing 8 effective civic learning strategies, encouraging respectful 9 dialogue, and offering educational resources related to free 10 speech and civic knowledge: 11 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 12 Sec. 7. ENERGY COST-SAVINGS PROJECTS ââ FINANCING. For 13 the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 14 2027, the state board of regents may use notes, bonds, or 15 other evidences of indebtedness issued under section 262.48 to 16 finance projects that will result in energy cost savings in an 17 amount that will cause the state board to recover the cost of 18 the projects within an average of six years. 19 DIVISION IV 20 STANDING APPROPRIATIONS 21 Sec. 8. AT-RISK CHILDREN. Notwithstanding the standing 22 appropriation in section 279.51 for the fiscal year beginning 23 July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the amount appropriated 24 from the general fund of the state to the department of 25 education for programs for at-risk children under section 26 279.51 shall not be more than $10,524,389. The amount of any 27 reduction in this section shall be prorated among the programs 28 specified in section 279.51, subsection 1, paragraphs âaâ, âbâ, 29 and âcâ. 30 Sec. 9. WORK-STUDY APPROPRIATION. Notwithstanding section 31 256.209, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and 32 ending June 30, 2027, the amount appropriated from the general 33 fund of the state to the college student aid commission of 34 the department of education for the work-study program under 35 -17- LSB 5012XG (9) 91 jda/jh 17/ 21 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ section 256.209 shall be zero. 1 Sec. 10. Section 256.194, subsections 1 and 2, Code 2026, 2 are amended to read as follows: 3 1. For each fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 4 2025, there is appropriated from the general fund of the 5 state to the commission for deposit in the Iowa tuition 6 grants fund established in section 256.189, subsection 3 , the 7 sum of fifty-three million seven hundred sixty-one thousand 8 two hundred ten fifty-four million five hundred sixty-seven 9 thousand six hundred twenty-eight dollars. 10 2. For each fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 2025, 11 there is appropriated from the general fund of the state to the 12 commission for deposit in the Iowa tuition grants for-profit 13 institutions fund established in section 256.191, subsection 8 , 14 the sum of one hundred twelve thousand nine hundred fourteen 15 one hundred fourteen thousand six hundred eight dollars. 16 DIVISION V 17 DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION ââ REPORTING REQUIREMENTS RELATED TO 18 ANTIBULLYING PROGRAMMING 19 Sec. 11. Section 279.51A, subsection 5, Code 2026, is 20 amended to read as follows: 21 5. a. Each school district shall report to the department 22 of education, in a manner prescribed by the department, an 23 annual count of all incidents of violence that result in 24 injury or property damage or assault by a student in a school 25 building, on school grounds, or at a school-sponsored function, 26 and any time a student is referred for the use of or transfer 27 to a therapeutic classroom. The report shall include but not 28 be limited to demographic information on students reported as 29 victims and reported as perpetrators of incidents of violence 30 that result in injury or property damage or assault, including 31 but not limited to disaggregated information on race, gender, 32 national origin, age, grade level, and disability, along with 33 any other data required for the department to implement the 34 federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act, as amended by 35 -18- LSB 5012XG (9) 91 jda/jh 18/ 21 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ the federal Every Student Succeeds Act, Pub. L. No. 114-95, 1 with appropriate safeguards to ensure student privacy. The 2 department shall compile the reports. 3 b. The department shall compile and summarize the reports, 4 categorized by behavior, and shall submit the summary an annual 5 report to the general assembly by on or before November 1 6 annually each year that contains all of the following: 7 (1) A summary of the annual reports compiled pursuant to 8 paragraph âaâ . 9 (2) A description of the departmentâs antibullying 10 programming and current and projected expenditures for the 11 antibullying programming for the immediately preceding fiscal 12 year. 13 c. A teacher or administrator who submits a report in 14 accordance with this section and who meets the requirements of 15 section 280.27 or section 613.21 shall be immune from civil 16 or criminal liability relating to such action, as well as for 17 participating in any administrative or judicial proceeding 18 resulting from or relating to the report pursuant to the 19 provisions of sections 280.27 and 613.21 . The provisions of 20 section 70A.29 shall apply to a teacher or administrator who 21 submits a report in accordance with this section or who reports 22 an incident of violence or assault to a local law enforcement 23 agency in good faith and without fraudulent intent or the 24 intent to deceive. Personal information regarding a student 25 in a report submitted pursuant to this section shall be kept 26 confidential as required under the federal Family Educational 27 Rights and Privacy Act, 20 U.S.C. Â§1232g, and in the same 28 manner as personal information in student records maintained, 29 created, collected, or assembled by or for a school corporation 30 or educational institution in accordance with section 22.7, 31 subsection 1 . 32 DIVISION VI 33 BOARD OF EDUCATIONAL EXAMINERS ââ FEES 34 Sec. 12. Section 256.155, subsections 2 and 3, Code 2026, 35 -19- LSB 5012XG (9) 91 jda/jh 19/ 21 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ are amended to read as follows: 1 2. Licensing fees are payable to the treasurer of state and 2 shall be deposited with the executive director of the board. 3 The executive director shall deposit twenty-five percent of 4 the fees collected annually with the treasurer of state and 5 the fees shall be credited to the general fund of the state. 6 The remaining licensing fees Licensing fees collected during 7 the fiscal year shall be retained by and are appropriated to 8 the board for the purposes related to the boardâs duties. 9 Notwithstanding section 8.33 , licensing fees retained by and 10 appropriated to the board pursuant to this section that remain 11 unencumbered or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year 12 shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for 13 the activities of the board as provided in this part until the 14 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 15 3. The executive director shall keep an accurate and 16 detailed account of fees received, including fees paid to the 17 treasurer of state and fees retained by the board. 18